Maryland, session 2025, HB0139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–104.
(a) (1) Each county shall have one administrative charging committee to serve
countywide law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies within the
county.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0139*

HOUSE BILL 139
(2) A county administrative charging committee shall be composed of:
(i) the chair of the county’s police accountability board, or another
member of the accountability board designated by the chair of the accountability board;
(ii) two civilian members selected by the county’s police
accountability board; and
(iii) two civilian members selected by the chief executive officer of the
county.
(b) (1) There shall be at least one statewide administrative charging
committee to serve statewide and bi–county law enforcement agencies.
(2) A statewide administrative charging committee shall be composed of:
(i) three civilian members appointed by the Governor;
(ii) one civilian member appointed by the President of the Senate;
and
(iii) one civilian member appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(c) Before serving as a member of an administrative charging committee, an
individual shall receive training on matters relating to police procedures from the
Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission.
(d) On completion of an investigation of a complaint of police misconduct
involving a member of the public and a police officer, regardless of whether the complaint
originated from within the law enforcement agency or from an external source, the law
enforcement agency shall forward to the appropriate administrative charging committee
the investigatory files for the matter.
(e) An administrative charging committee shall:
(1) review the findings of a law enforcement agency’s investigation
conducted and forwarded in accordance with subsection (d) of this section;
(2) make a determination that the police officer who is subject to
investigation shall be:
(i) administratively charged; or
(ii) not administratively charged;
(3) if the police officer is charged, recommend discipline in accordance with
the law enforcement agency’s disciplinary matrix established in accordance with § 3–105

HOUSE BILL 139 3
of this subtitle;
(4) review any body camera footage that may be relevant to the matters
covered in the complaint of misconduct;
(5) authorize a police officer called to appear before an administrative
charging committee to be accompanied by a representative;
(6) issue a written opinion that describes in detail its findings,
determinations, and recommendations; and
(7) forward the written opinion to the chief of the law enforcement agency,
the police officer, and the complainant.
(f) In executing its duties in accordance with subsection (e) of this section, an
administrative charging committee may:
(1) request information or action from the law enforcement agency that
conducted the investigation, including requiring additional investigation and the issuance
of subpoenas;
(2) if the police officer is not administratively charged, make a
determination that:
(i) the allegations against the police officer are unfounded; or
(ii) the police officer is exonerated; and
(3) record, in writing, any failure of supervision that caused or contributed
to a police officer’s misconduct.
(g) An administrative charging committee shall meet once per month or as
needed.
(h) A member of an administrative charging committee shall maintain
confidentiality relating to a matter being considered by the administrative charging
committee until final disposition of the matter.
3–113.
(a) (1) The investigating unit of a law enforcement agency shall immediately
review a complaint by a member of the public alleging police officer misconduct.
(2) THE INVESTIGATING UNIT SHALL COMPLETE ITS REVIEW AND
FORWARD ITS INVESTIGATORY FILES TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING
COMMITTEE AS SOON AS POSSIBLE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 9 MONTHS AFTER THE
FILING OF A COMPLAINT.

HOUSE BILL 139
(b) An administrative charging committee shall review and make a determination
or ask for further review within 30 days after completion of the investigating unit’s review.
(c) The process of review by the investigating unit through disposition by the
administrative charging committee shall be completed within 1 year and 1 day after the
filing of a complaint by a citizen.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.